Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 1 General Provisions

3-5-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Barrel” means 31 gallons.

“Brewer” means a manufacturer of malt beverages.

“Case” means a box or receptacle containing not more than 288 ounces of malt beverages on the average.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-4101, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 406, § 7/SB 85.

The 2017 amendment,

effective September 1, 2017, added paragraph (1); and redesignated former paragraphs (1) and (2) as present paragraphs (2) and (3), respectively.

3-5-2.
Determination as to when possession occurs.

For purposes of this chapter, with respect to malt beverages manufactured within this state, possession occurs when the product is first identifiable as a malt beverage, in accordance with this title and such regulations as may be promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to this title. With respect to malt beverages shipped from outside this state to a destination within this state, possession in the consignee occurs when the malt beverage first physically enters the state or when the risk of loss from destruction or casualty to the malt beverage is shifted from the consignor to the consignee located in this state, in accordance with the contract of the parties and the substantive commercial laws of this state, whichever event occurs first.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-4102, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

Cross references.

Placement of risks of loss in absence of breach of contract, §

11-2-509

.

3-5-3.
Malt beverages upon which taxes not paid and motor vehicles, watercraft, or aircraft used in transporting same declared contraband.

Malt beverages in quantities exceeding the amount specified in Code Section 3-3-8, upon which the taxes imposed by or authorized pursuant to this chapter have not been paid in this state, are declared to be contraband; and any motor vehicle, watercraft, or aircraft used in transporting such beverages in excess of the amount specified in Code Section 3-3-8 are also declared to be contraband and subject to seizure and disposition as provided by this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 148, § 4; Ga. L. 1971, p. 817, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 476, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1424, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-4103, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 40.

3-5-4.
Production of malt beverages in private residences; consumption; transportation and delivery; home-brew special events.

Malt beverages may be produced by a person in his or her private residence subject to the limitations provided in this Code section.

The total quantity of malt beverages that may be produced in any private residence shall be as follows:

Not more than 100 gallons per calendar year if there is only one person of legal drinking age living in such residence; or

Not more than 200 gallons per calendar year if there are two or more persons of legal drinking age living in such residence;

provided, however, that no more than 50 gallons shall be produced in a 90 day period.

Except as provided for in subsections (d) and (e) of this Code section, malt beverages produced in compliance with this Code section may only be consumed at the residence where produced. Such malt beverages may only be consumed by persons of legal drinking age.

Malt beverages produced under the provisions of this Code section may be removed from the residence where produced for transportation and delivery by the producer for use at home-brew special events in a quantity not to exceed 25 gallons, provided that such malt beverages are securely sealed in one or more containers and clearly labeled with the following information:

The name of the producer;

The address of the residence at which it was produced;

The name and address of the home-brew special event to which it is being transported; and

The permit number under which the home-brew special event is being held.

If transported in a motor vehicle, the securely sealed containers shall be placed in a locked glove compartment, a locked trunk, or the area behind the last upright seat of a motor vehicle that is not equipped with a trunk.

Malt beverages produced under the provisions of this Code section may be removed from the residence where produced for transportation and delivery by the producer to a location not licensed under this title and for which a permit has not been issued pursuant to subsection (e) of this Code section; provided that not more than 128 ounces of such malt beverages produced in the same residence shall be transported at one time; and provided, further, that such malt beverages shall be securely sealed in one or more containers and clearly labeled with the following information:

The name of the producer; and

The address of the residence at which it was produced.

If transported in a motor vehicle, the securely sealed containers shall be placed in a locked glove compartment, a locked trunk, or the area behind the last upright seat of a motor vehicle that is not equipped with a trunk.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title to the contrary, in all counties and municipalities in which the sale of malt beverages is lawful, the local governing authority may issue a home-brew special event permit for the holding of home-brew special events, including contests, tastings, and judgings. Any governing authority desiring to allow home-brew special events to be held within its jurisdiction shall provide by resolution or ordinance for the issuance of home-brew special event permits and shall specify the events that shall qualify as home-brew special events. A home-brew special event permit shall cost $50.00 and shall be valid for not more than six events per calendar year.

Home-brew special events shall not be held at any location licensed under this title.

Consumption of malt beverages at home-brew special events shall be limited solely to malt beverages produced pursuant to this Code section, and such malt beverages shall only be consumed by the participants in and judges of the home-brew special events.

Malt beverages produced pursuant to this Code section shall not be sold, offered for sale, or made available for consumption by the general public.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-5-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 537, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 617, § 1/HB 99; Ga. L. 2014, p. 187, § 2/HB 737.

3-5-5.
Retail sale of kegs; required labeling; removal of labels.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Keg” means any brewery-sealed container or barrel containing, by liquid volume, more than two gallons of malt beverage.

“Retail dealer,” “retail licensee,” or “licensee” means a person holding either a retail dealer license, a permit issued by the commissioner authorizing the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption only on the premises for a period not to exceed one day, or a beverage alcohol caterer license.

No person licensed under this chapter shall sell malt beverages at retail by the keg except as provided in subsections (c), (d), and (e) of this Code section. The commissioner may take punitive action against violators, up to and including revocation of the state retail dealer’s license of any licensed retail dealer who fails to comply with this Code section. The undertaking of any punitive action allowed under this Code section shall not prohibit criminal prosecution for sale to underage persons.

Each retail licensee selling kegs containing malt beverages for consumption off licensed premises shall require each keg purchaser to present a Georgia driver’s license or other proper identification at the time of purchase. The licensee shall record for each keg sale: the date of sale; the size of keg; the keg identification number; the amount of container deposit; the name; address; date of birth of the purchaser; and the form of identification presented by such purchaser. The purchaser shall sign a statement at the time of purchase attesting to the accuracy of the purchaser’s name and address, the location where the contents of the keg will be consumed, and acknowledging that a violation of Code Section 3-3-23, as it relates to furnishing alcoholic beverages to persons under the age of 21 years, may result in civil liability, criminal prosecution, or both. The licensee shall retain the identification form and purchaser’s signed statement attesting to the accuracy of the purchaser’s name and address and acknowledging that a violation of Code Section 3-3-23, as it relates to furnishing alcoholic beverages to persons under the age of 21 years, may result in civil liability, criminal prosecution, or both, for a minimum of six months following the sale of the keg.

Each keg sold at retail for consumption off licensed premises shall be labeled with the name and address of the retail licensee, the keg identification number, and the state alcohol license number of the business. The Department of Revenue will prescribe the form of registration label or tag to be used for this purpose. The registration label or tag shall be supplied by the Department of Revenue without fee and securely affixed to the keg by the licensee making the sale. In addition to the label or tag, the Department of Revenue shall provide guidelines to the licensee on the information to be recorded on the identification form required under subsection (c) of this Code section.

The licensee shall record the date of return of the keg on the identification form required under subsection (c) of this Code section. If there is no label or tag affixed to the keg or if the identification number is not legible, the licensee shall indicate this fact on the identification form required under subsection (c) of this Code section. The licensee shall not refund a deposit for a keg that is returned without the required label or tag and identification number intact and legible.

The removal of the required label shall be unlawful until such time that it is lawfully returned to the retailer by the purchaser. Possession of a keg without the required label and identification number shall be unlawful and subject to penalty pursuant to Code Section 3-3-9.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-5-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1100, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 3.